Tennessee, session 114, SB0440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 56, Chapter 26, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding this title, excepted benefits as defined in § 56-7-2802 are
exempt from a requirement to provide coverage for a specific person, provider,
treatment, service, condition, or disease unless coverage of excepted benefits is
expressly required by law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies or contracts for insurance that are entered into, issued, delivered, amended,
or renewed on or after that date.
SB0440
002045
- 1 -